Massachusetts, session 194th, H694.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 74 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in line 9, the following words:-
“conditions of admission of student,”
SECTION 2. Section 7 of Chapter 74 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “board,” in line 8, the following
words:-
“provided that such admission would be in accordance with requirements for admission
established pursuant to Section 3 and Section 59 of this chapter,”
SECTION 3. Section 5 of Chapter 74 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following words:-
of 3

“Requirements for admission to an independent vocational-technical school established
pursuant to Section 4 of this chapter shall be determined by the district trustees for such an
independent vocational-technical school. Changes to duly established requirements for
admission to such an independent vocational-technical school shall be made by a majority vote
of the district trustees and may be made only after at least one public hearing , held at least thirty
days after the proposed change to admission requirements has been made public, and at which
the public may offer remarks. Notice of the time and place of said public hearing, and of the
availability for review of the proposed change to admission requirements shall be provided to
each person who has previously requested the receipt of such notices from the district trustees, as
well as to individuals and organizations known to the district trustees to have an interest in issues
related to vocational-technical education.”
SECTION 4. Chapter 74 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding a new
section:-
Section 59. (a) Requirements for admission to a vocational-technical school established
pursuant to Section 3 of this chapter shall be determined by the board of trustees for the
vocational-technical school or, if there is no such board of trustees, the school committee of the
municipality. Changes to duly established requirements for admission to such a vocational-
technical school shall be made by a majority vote of the district trustees and may be made only
after at least one public hearing, held at least thirty days after the proposed change to admission
requirements has been made public, and at which the public may offer remarks. Notice of the
time and place of said public hearing, and of the availability for review of the proposed change to
admission requirements shall be provided to each person who has previously requested the
receipt of such notices from the board of trustees for the vocational-technical school or, if there
of 3

is no such board of trustees, the school committee, as well as to individuals and organizations
known to the board of trustees for the vocational-technical school or, if there is no such board of
trustees, the school committee to have an interest in issues related to vocational-technical
education.
(b) Requirements for admission to an independent vocational-technical school established
pursuant to Section 5A of this chapter shall be determined by the board of regional school district
trustees for vocational-technical education, pursuant to Section 5A, for such a vocational-
technical school. Changes to duly established requirements for admission to such an
independent vocational-technical school shall be made by a majority vote of the district trustees
and may be made only after at least one public hearing, held at least thirty days after the
proposed change to admission requirements has been made public, and at which the public may
offer remarks. Notice of the time and place of said public hearing, and of the availability for
review of the proposed change to admission requirements shall be provided to each person who
has previously requested the receipt of such notices from the board of regional school district
trustees for vocational-technical education, as well as to individuals and organizations known to
the board of regional school district trustees for vocational-technical education to have an
interest in issues related to vocational-technical education.”
of 3